Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 34 Licensing of Clinical Laboratories and Blood Banks

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discovery of identity of blood donor, 56 ALR4th 755.

§ 33-34-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Blood bank” means a facility for the collection, processing or storage of human blood or blood derivatives, but shall not include such a facility located in a memorial, district or private hospital;

“Clinical laboratory” means any facility for the microbiological, serological, chemical, hematological, biophysical, cytological or pathological examination of materials derived from the human body for the purpose of obtaining information for the diagnosis, prevention or treatment of disease or the assessment of medical condition;

“Laboratory director” means the person who is responsible for administration of the technical and scientific operation of a clinical laboratory or blood bank, including supervision of procedures and reporting of findings of tests;

“Laboratory reference system” means a system of periodic testing of methods, procedures and materials of clinical laboratories and blood banks, including without limitation the distribution of manuals of approved methods, inspection of facilities, cooperative research and periodic submission of test specimens for examination;

“State agency” means the Wyoming department of health;

“This act” means W.S.

33-34-101

and

33-34-107

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-415; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2016 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “and

33-34-107

” for “through

33-34-109

” in (a)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-34-102.
Required license and certification. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-416; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-34-103.
Issuance of certificates of qualification. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-417; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-34-104.
Issuance of laboratory license. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-418; Laws 1990, ch. 104, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-34-105.
Duties and powers of state agency. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-419; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-34-106.
Advisory committee. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-420; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-34-107.
Acceptance, collection, identification and examination of specimens.

A clinical laboratory may examine human specimens at the request of a licensed physician, dentist or other person authorized by law to use the findings of laboratory examinations. A clinical laboratory may examine human specimens at the request of any person for the purpose of testing and analysis and a licensed physician or other authorized person shall not be required to collect the specimens as provided under subsection (d) of this section.

The results of a test shall only be reported to or as directed by the person who requested it. The reports shall include the name of the laboratory director and the name and address of the clinical laboratory in which the test was actually performed.

All specimens accepted by a clinical laboratory shall be tested on the premises unless forwarded to another properly licensed clinical laboratory. Any tests made outside Wyoming must be made by a laboratory having a valid federal interstate license.

Only a licensed physician or an authorized person may collect specimens.

Subsection (d) of this section shall not apply to a direct to consumer test. For the purpose of this subsection and as further defined by the department of health, a “direct to consumer test” means a diagnostic device that is marketed directly to consumers, where the consumer initiates the testing process and collects their own human specimen for the purpose of testing and analysis by a clinical laboratory.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-421; 2021 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (a), substituted "may" for "shall," deleted "only" following "specimens," added the second sentence; and added (e).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added "laboratory" preceding "director" in the second sentence of (b).

§ 33-34-108.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-422; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 33-34-109.
Penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-423; repealed by 2016 ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.